Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-921
Drainage improvements; additional assessments.

Should unexpected expenses or awards of damages require a supplemental assessment of benefits to pay for such improvements, the board shall have the authority to make such supplemental assessments in the manner provided in section 31-920. Should this additional amount to be so assessed be less than five hundred dollars, the board in its discretion may pay the same from the drainage fund created by section 31-905.

Laws 1959, c. 132, § 21, p. 491.